Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1118
Insurance requirements.

Nothing in the State Building Construction Alternatives Act shall limit or reduce statutory or regulatory requirements regarding insurance.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 18.